North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 1A. Legislative Retirement System.
§ 120-4.22A.
Post-retirement increases in allowances.

Retired members and beneficiaries of the Retirement System shall receive post-retirement increases in allowances on the same basis as post-retirement increases in allowances are provided to retired members and beneficiaries of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1986, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1986, shall be increased by the same amount as provided to retired members and beneficiaries of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 135-5(ii) and (jj).

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1987, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1987, shall be increased by the same amount as provided to retired members and beneficiaries of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 135-5(ii) and (jj).

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1988, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1988, shall be increased by the same amount as provided to retired members and beneficiaries of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 135-5(ll) and (mm).

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1989, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1989, shall be increased by the same amount as provided to retired members and beneficiaries of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 135-5(ll) and (mm).

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1990, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1990, shall be increased by the same amount as provided to retired members and beneficiaries of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 135-5(rr) and (ss).

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1992, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1992, shall be increased by one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1992. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1992, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 1992, but before June 30, 1992, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 1992 and June 30, 1992.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1993, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1993, shall be increased by one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the allowance payable on January 1, 1993. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1993, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 1993, but before June 30, 1993, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 1993, and June 30, 1993.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1994, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1994, shall be increased by three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the allowance payable on January 1, 1994. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1994, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 1994, but before June 30, 1994, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 1994, and June 30, 1994.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1995, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1995, shall be increased by two percent (2%) of the allowance payable on January 1, 1995. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1995, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 1995, but before June 30, 1995, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two percent (2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 1995, and June 30, 1995.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after September 1, 1996, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1996, shall be increased by four and four-tenths percent (4.4%) of the allowance payable on January 1, 1996. Furthermore, from and after September 1, 1996, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 1996, but before June 30, 1996, shall be increased by a prorated amount of four and four-tenths percent (4.4%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 1996, and June 30, 1996.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1997, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1997, shall be increased by four percent (4%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 1997. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1997, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 1997, but before June 30, 1997, shall be increased by a prorated amount of four percent (4%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 1997, and June 30, 1997.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1998, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1998, shall be increased by two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 1998. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1998, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 1998, but before June 30, 1998, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 1998, and June 30, 1998.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 1999, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 1999, shall be increased by two and three-tenths percent (2.3%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 1999. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1999, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 1999, but before June 30, 1999, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two and three-tenths percent (2.3%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 1999, and June 30, 1999.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 2000, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2000, shall be increased by three and six-tenths percent (3.6%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2000. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2000, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2000, but before June 30, 2000, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three and six-tenths percent (3.6%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2000, and June 30, 2000.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 2001, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2001, shall be increased by two percent (2%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2001. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2001, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2001, but before June 30, 2001, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two percent (2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2001, and June 30, 2001.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 2002, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2002, shall be increased by one and four-tenths percent (1.4%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2002. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2002, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2002, but before June 30, 2002, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and four-tenths percent (1.4%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2002, and June 30, 2002.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 2003, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2003, shall be increased by one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2003. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2003, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2003, but before June 30, 2003, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2003, and June 30, 2003.

From and after July 1, 2004, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2004, shall be increased by one and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2004, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2004, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2004, but before June 30, 2004, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2004, and June 30, 2004.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 2005, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2005, shall be increased by two percent (2%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2005. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2005, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2005, but before June 30, 2005, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two percent (2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2005, and June 30, 2005.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 2006, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2006, shall be increased by three percent (3%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2006. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2006, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2006, but before June 30, 2006, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three percent (3%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2006, and June 30, 2006.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 2007, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2007, shall be increased by two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2007. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2007, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2007, but before June 30, 2007, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2007, and June 30, 2007.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 2008, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2008, shall be increased by two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2008. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2008, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2008, but before June 30, 2008, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2008, and June 30, 2008.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 2012, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2012, shall be increased by one percent (1%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2012. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2012, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2012, but before June 30, 2012, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one percent (1%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2012, and June 30, 2012.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 2014, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2014, shall be increased by one percent (1%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2014. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2014, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2014, but before June 30, 2014, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one percent (1%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2014, and June 30, 2014.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, on or before October 31, 2016, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2016, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1, 2016. The payment shall be one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2016, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.

(aa)

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, from and after July 1, 2017, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before January 1, 2017, shall be increased by one percent (1%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2017. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2017, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after January 1, 2017, but before June 30, 2017, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one percent (1%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2017, and June 30, 2017.

(bb)

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, on or before October 31, 2018, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2018, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1, 2018. The payment shall be one percent (1%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2018, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.

(cc)

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, on or before December 31, 2021, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2021, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1, 2021. The payment shall be two percent (2%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2021, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.

(dd)

In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, after September 1, 2022, but on or before October 31, 2022, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2022, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1, 2022. The payment shall be three percent (3%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2022, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.”

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 49(c); 1987, c. 738, s. 27(d); 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 22(d); 1989, c. 752, s. 41(d); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1077, s. 11; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 53(d); 1993, c. 321, s. 74(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.30(k); 1995, c. 507, s. 7.22(c); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 28.21(c); 1997-443, s. 33.22(f); 1998-153, s. 21(c); 1999-237, s. 28.23(c); 2000-67, s. 26.20(f); 2001-424, s. 32.22(c); 2002-126, s. 28.8(d); 2003-284, s. 30.17(c); 2004-124, s. 31.17(c); 2005-276, s. 29.25(c); 2006-66, s. 22.18(b); 2007-323, s. 28.20(c); 2008-107, s. 26.23(c); 2012-142, s. 25.13(c); 2014-100, s. 35.14(c); 2016-94, s. 36.21(c); 2017-57, s. 35.19A(c); 2018-5, s. 35.28(c); 2021-180, s. 39.23(c).

§ 120-4.23.
Reexamination for disability retirement allowance.

Any disability retiree who has not reached age 65 shall be reexamined pursuant to G.S. 135-5(e). After he reaches age 65, no further examinations are required.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238.

§ 120-4.24.
Return to membership of former member.

If a retired former member of the Retirement System or of the Legislative Retirement Fund returns to service as a member of the General Assembly, his retirement allowance shall cease and he shall be restored as a member of the Retirement System. The computation of the amount of benefits to which he may subsequently become entitled under this Article shall be computed as follows:

Upon his subsequent retirement, he shall be paid a retirement allowance determined as follows:

For a member who earns at least three years’ membership service after restoration to service, the retirement allowance shall be computed on the basis of his compensation and service before and after the period of prior retirement without restrictions.

For a member who does not earn three years’ membership service after restoration to service, the retirement allowance shall be equal to the sum of the retirement allowance to which he would have been entitled had he not been restored to service, without modification of the election of an optional allowance previously made, and the retirement allowance that results from service earned since being restored to service.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1987, c. 738, s. 39(a).

§ 120-4.25.
Return of accumulated contributions.

If a member ceases to be a member of the General Assembly except by death or retirement, the member shall, upon submission of an application, be paid not earlier than 60 days following the date of termination of service the sum of the member’s accumulated contributions provided the member has not in the meantime returned to service. Upon payment of this sum his or her membership in the System ceases. If the individual becomes a member afterwards, no credit shall be allowed for any service previously rendered except as provided in

G.S. 120-4.14

and the payment shall be in full and complete discharge of any rights in or to any benefits otherwise payable under this Article. Upon receipt of proof satisfactory to the Board of Trustees of the death, prior to retirement, of a member or former member, there shall be paid to the person or persons the member or former member nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if the person or persons are living at the time of the member’s death, otherwise to the member’s legal representatives, the amount of the member’s accumulated contributions at the time of the member’s death, unless the beneficiary elects to receive the alternate benefit under the provisions of

G.S. 120-4.28

.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 197; 1987, c. 738, s. 31(e); 1993, c. 531, s. 1; 2009-66, s. 11(k); 2014-88, s. 2(c); 2017-129, s. 3(f).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-66, s. 11(k), effective July 1, 2009, inserted “electronic submission prior to completing 10 years of service in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2014-88, s. 2(c), effective January 1, 2015, substituted “the sum of his accumulated contributions” for “the sum of his contributions if he has less than five years of creditable service, or the sum of his accumulated contributions if he has five or more years of creditable service” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2017-129, s. 3(f) effective January 1, 2018, made gender-neautralizing changes throughout, and deleted “prior to completing 10 years of service” following “electronic submission” in the last sentence.

§ 120-4.26.
Benefit payment options.

Any member may elect to receive his benefits in a retirement allowance payable throughout life, or he may elect to receive the actuarial equivalent of the retirement allowance in a reduced allowance payable throughout life under the provisions of one of the options set forth below. No election may be made after the first payment becomes due, or the first retirement check cashed, nor may an election be revoked or a nomination changed. The election of Option 2 or Option 3 or the nomination of the person thereunder shall be revoked if the person nominated dies prior to the date the first payment becomes normally due or until the first retirement check has been cashed. The election may be revoked by the member prior to the date the first payment becomes normally due or until his first retirement check has been cashed. Provided, however, in the event a member has elected Option 2 or Option 3 and nominated his or her spouse to receive a retirement allowance upon the member’s death, and the spouse predeceases the member after the first payment becomes normally due or the first retirement check has been cashed, if the member remarries he or she may nominate a new spouse to receive the retirement allowance under the previously elected option, within 90 days of the remarriage. The new nomination shall be effective on the first day of the month in which it is made and shall provide for a retirement allowance computed to be the actuarial equivalent of the retirement allowance in effect immediately prior to the effective date of the new nomination. Any member having elected Options 2 or 3 and nominated his or her spouse to receive a retirement allowance upon the member’s death may, after divorce from his or her spouse, revoke the nomination and elect a new option, effective on the first day of the month in which the new option is elected, providing for a retirement allowance computed to be the actuarial equivalent to the retirement allowance in effect immediately prior to the effective date of the new option.

Option 1. For Members Retiring Prior to July 1, 1993. —

If a member dies within 10 years from his retirement date, an amount equal to his accumulated contributions at retirement, less one-one hundred twentieth (1/120) for each month for which he has received a retirement allowance payment, shall be paid to his legal representative or to the person he nominates by written designation acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees;

Option 2. —

Upon his death, his reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to the person he nominates by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees at the time of his retirement. If the person selected is other than his spouse, the reduced retirement allowance payable to the member shall not be less than one half of the retirement allowance without optional modification which would otherwise be payable to him; or

Option 3. —

Upon his death, one half of his reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to the person he nominates by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees at the time of his retirement.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1985, c. 649, s. 9; 1993, c. 321, s. 74.1(a); 1998-212, s. 28.26(a).

§ 120-4.26A.
Benefits on death after retirement.

In the event of the death of a retired member while in receipt of a retirement allowance under the provisions of this Article, there shall be paid to such person or persons as the retiree shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if such person or persons are living at the time of the retiree’s death, otherwise to the retiree’s legal representatives, a death benefit equal to the excess, if any, of the accumulated contributions of the retiree at the date of retirement over the total of the retirement allowances paid prior to the death of the retiree.

In the event that a retirement allowance becomes payable to the designated survivor of a retired member under the provisions of

G.S. 120-4.26

and such retirement allowance to the survivor shall terminate upon the death of the survivor before the total of the retirement allowances paid to the retiree and the designated survivor combined equals the amount of the accumulated contributions of the retiree at the date of retirement, the excess, if any, of such accumulated contributions over the total of the retirement allowances paid to the retiree and the survivor combined shall be paid in a lump sum to such person or persons as the retiree shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if such person or persons are living at the time such payment falls due, otherwise to the retiree’s legal representative.

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 74.1(b); 2009-66, s. 11(l).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-66, s. 11(
l
), effective July 1, 2009, inserted “electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by” in both paragraphs.